Maryland, session 2025, HB0570.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
12 That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
13 Article – Local Government
14 20–426.
15 (a) Except in [Talbot County or] Wicomico County, if a hotel fails to pay the hotel
16 rental tax to a county within 1 month after the payment is due under § 20–410 of this
17 subtitle, the hotel shall pay a tax penalty of 10% of the unpaid tax.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0570*

2 HOUSE BILL 570
1 (b) If a hotel fails to pay the hotel rental tax to [Talbot County or] Wicomico
2 County within 120 days after the payment is due under § 20–410 of this subtitle, the hotel
3 shall pay a tax penalty of 10% of the unpaid tax.
4 SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
5 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.